Utah statutes.
75-3-713.   Persons dealing with personal representative -- Protection.
A person who in good faith either assists a personal representative or deals
with him for value is protected as if the personal representative properly
exercised his power. The fact that a person knowingly deals with a personal
representative does not alone require the person to inquire into the existence
of a power or the propriety of its exercise. Except for restrictions on powers
of supervised personal representatives which are endorsed on letters as
provided in Section 75-3-504, no provision in any will or order of court
purporting to limit the power of a personal representative is effective except
as to persons with actual knowledge thereof. A person is not bound to see to
the proper application of estate assets paid or delivered to a personal
representative. The protection here expressed extends to instances in which
some procedural irregularity or jurisdictional defect occurred in proceedings
leading to the issuance of letters, including a case in which the alleged
decedent is found to be alive. The protection here expressed is not by
substitution for that provided by comparable provisions of the laws relating
to commercial transactions and laws simplifying transfers of securities by
fiduciaries.
